Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8903
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Veterinary Drug Distribution Licensing Act, the definitions found in sections 71-8904 to 71-8911 shall apply.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 3.